Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska36-402
Lands; estate and interest in lands, defined.

The term lands, as used in sections 36-402 to 36-409, shall be construed as coextensive in meaning with lands, tenements, and hereditaments, and the term estate and interest in lands, shall be construed to embrace every estate and interest, freehold and chattel, legal and equitable, present and future, vested and contingent, in lands, as above described.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 81, p. 296;

R.S.1913, § 2627;

C.S.1922, § 2455;

C.S.1929, § 36-107;

R.S.1943, § 36-402.